Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 5. Home Loan Bonds.

§ 43-33-201.
Trustees, etc., may accept bonds.

All trustees, executors, administrators, guardians, committees, receivers and other persons and corporations holding trust funds; and all corporations and private banks organized under or subject to the provisions of the laws of this state respecting banking in any form, and all building and loan associations organized or doing business under the laws of this state, conservator, liquidator, or rehabilitator of any such corporation, building and loan association or private banks organized under and subject to the provisions of the laws of this state respecting banking in any form; and persons, partnerships or corporations organized under or subject to the provision of the laws of this state respecting insurance; and the conservator, liquidator or rehabilitator of any such person, partnership or corporation organized under or subject to the provisions of any laws of this state respecting insurance; and other domestic corporations, and any other corporation that shall have made or shall hold an investment, whether with or without specified ratio, of real property security in a bond or notes or other evidence of indebtedness secured by mortgage or deed of trust on real property, or shares or part thereof, whether guaranteed or not, may, at any time, exchange, prior or subsequent to maturity, such bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness and the mortgage or deed of trust, or any share or part thereof, and any rights in respect thereto for the bonds of the Home Owners’ Loan Corporation or the bonds of any Federal Home Loan Bank, at par and may hold such bonds as authorized and lawful investments for any and all persons notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law of this state inconsistent with the provisions of this section, subject to the sole limitation that in all cases where any of the foregoing are for any reason acting or being operated or liquidated under the orders of any chancery court of this state, that an order approving such exchange or investment be first obtained from the chancery court having jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7343; Laws, 1934, ch. 213.

§ 43-33-203.
Counties, etc., may accept Home Owners’ Loan Corporation.

The board of supervisors of any county, the mayor and board of aldermen, the mayor and city council, or other governing authorities, of any municipality of the state, and guardians, trustees, and receivers in chancery are authorized and empowered to accept in full and final settlement of any indebtedness due such county or municipality (except taxes and moneys due by virtue of special assessments), guardian, trustee, or receiver, and equivalent amount of bonds of the Home Owners’ Loan Corporation, at par value, in exchange for such indebtedness. In the case of guardians, trustees and receivers in chancery such exchange or acceptance of such bonds shall first be approved by the chancery court having jurisdiction over such guardian, trustee or receiver.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7344; Laws, 1934, ch. 216.